Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2709
Tractor model testing order; discrimination
prohibited; exception.

Except when a temporary permit has
been issued pursuant to subsection (4) of section 2-2701, tractors
shall be tested by the board in the order in which they are presented for
such tests, and no discrimination shall be made for or against any person
in any manner whatsoever. Complaints alleging a violation of this section
shall be heard by the department.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. III, § 44, p. 1397;

R.R.S.1943, § 75-344;

Laws 1967, c. 480, § 9, p. 1489;

Laws 1971, LB 692, § 9;

Laws 1986, LB 768, § 12;

Laws 2012, LB907, § 4.
July 19, 2012